Illinois, session 104th, HB5516.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Health 5Care Worker Platform Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions.7    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.8    "Health care facility" means any facility used to provide 9health care or related services.10    "Health care worker" means any health care professional or 11worker who, directly or through a company other than the 12health care worker platform, provides health care or directly 13related services to patients, including professionals or 14workers who are providing a type of service to patients that 15does not require a license.16    "Health care worker platform" means any person, 17corporation, partnership, or association that operates or 18offers a platform. A "health care worker platform" shall not 19be considered a nurse agency as defined in the Nurse Agency 20Licensing Act or a day and temporary labor service agency as 21defined by the Day and Temporary Labor Services Act.22    "Platform" means an electronic platform, system, or 23application through which health care workers can accept one   HB5516- 2 -LRB104 20076 BAB 33527 b1or more shifts to perform health care related services at a 2health care facility. 3    Section 10. Registration.4    (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), each health care 5worker platform shall register with the Department prior to 6operating in this State.7    (b) A health care worker platform operating in this State 8on the effective date of this Act shall submit an application 9for registration to the Department no more than 90 days after 10the effective date of this Act. A health care worker platform 11that applies for registration with the Department as described 12in this subsection may continue to operate until the 13Department takes final action on its application.14    (c) An applicant for registration as a health care worker 15platform shall pay a $1,000 fee to the Department and submit to 16the Department an application that contains:17        (1) the name of each shareholder or owner of the 18    health care worker platform with an ownership interest 19    greater than 10%;20        (2) the name of each of the health care worker 21    platform's officers, directors, members, and partners, as 22    applicable;23        (3) the health care worker platform's certificate of 24    good standing;25        (4) the health care worker platform's articles of   HB5516- 3 -LRB104 20076 BAB 33527 b1    incorporation or other establishing document; and2        (5) a certification that the health care worker 3    platform is aware of and will comply with the requirements 4    of this Act.5    (d) A registration issued under this Act to a health care 6worker platform is valid for one year after the date of its 7issuance by the Department.8    (e) A health care worker platform renewing its 9registration under this Act shall pay a $1,000 fee to the 10Department and submit an application for renewal to the 11Department that either certifies that no information required 12for registration has changed or provides updated information 13as necessary.14    (f) The Department shall review and issue a decision on 15each new application or application for renewal of a 16registration within 30 days after the submission of the new 17application or application for renewal. The Department shall 18approve an application or application for renewal and issue or 19renew a registration if the applicant has submitted a 20completed application, paid any required fees, and meets or 21continues to meet the registration requirements set forth in 22this Act. A health care worker platform that is registered 23with the Department may continue to operate until the 24Department takes final action on its application for renewal.25    (g) The Department may deny, refuse to renew, revoke, or 26suspend a health care worker platform registration for any of   HB5516- 4 -LRB104 20076 BAB 33527 b1the following reasons:2        (1) lack of financial solvency or suitability;3        (2) failure to comply with the conditions or 4    requirements to obtain and retain a registration;5        (3) material failure to comply with any other 6    requirement of this Act or the rules adopted under this 7    Act; or8        (4) knowingly providing a health care worker with an 9    illegally or fraudulently obtained or issued diploma, 10    registration, license, certificate, or criminal records 11    check.12    (h) The Department shall allow an appeal of any decision 13not to approve an application or an application for renewal 14for registration under this Act. 15    Section 15. Recordkeeping.16    (a) A health care worker platform shall retain records 17demonstrating the following:18        (1) each health care worker using the platform:19            (A) meets minimum applicable licensing, training, 20        and continuing education standards for the role or 21        roles that the worker is seeking on the platform;22            (B) has completed and passed any applicable 23        criminal records checks;24            (C) has passed an exclusion check from the 25        Department of Public Health Office of the Inspector   HB5516- 5 -LRB104 20076 BAB 33527 b1        General;2            (D) has completed an annual physical, if the 3        health care worker provides direct services to 4        patients; and5            (E) has current cardiopulmonary resuscitation 6        certification, if the health care worker provides 7        direct services to patients;8        (2) the health care worker platform maintains 9    occupational accident insurance that applies to the work 10    of health care workers who obtain work through the 11    platform, unless such health care workers maintain such 12    insurance themselves or are otherwise protected by 13    insurance for work-related injuries or diseases; and14        (3) the health care worker platform maintains general 15    liability or professional liability insurance of at least 16    $1,000,000 per incident and $3,000,000 in aggregate.17    (b) A health care worker platform shall retain the records 18required by subsection (a) for at least 3 years. 19    Section 20. Operational requirements.20    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, compliance 21with this Act and any other applicable laws, rules, 22regulations, industry standards, or health care accreditation 23organization requirements concerning licensing, compliance 24methods, training, continuing education, safety, or quality 25control shall not be construed to indicate that the health   HB5516- 6 -LRB104 20076 BAB 33527 b1care worker platform is exerting control or direction over 2health care workers or that health care workers are 3economically dependent on the health care worker platform.4    (b) A health care worker platform shall not:5        (1) require a health care worker to enter into a 6    noncompete agreement with the platform;7        (2) require a health care worker or health care 8    facility to pay any fee or compensation to the platform if 9    a health care worker accepts an offer of employment from a 10    health care facility; or11        (3) restrict a health care worker from 12    contemporaneously working shifts or employment with a 13    health care facility or another platform.14    (c) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit a 15health care worker platform from generally advertising to the 16public that the health care worker platform is seeking health 17care workers to use the platform. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.